vi: Dạng máy tính: Tất cả trong một; Máy chủ phiến; Chromebook; Máy khách trên đám mây; Nhỏ gọn; Chuyển đổi; JBOD; Lưu trữ nối mạng; Netbook; Notebook; Máy khách để bàn từ xa; SAN; Bộ khung lưu trữ; USF; Ultrabook; Máy khách VDI; Máy trạm; Máy trạm không xử lý; Khác
it: Forma del computer: All-in-one; Blade server; Chromebook; Cloud client; Compatta; Convertibile; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Notebook; Client desktop remoto; SAN; Sistema storage; USF; Ultrabook; Client VDI; Stazione di lavoro; Zero client; Altro
sk-SK: Typ počítača: Všetko v jednom; Blade (žiletkový) server; Chromebook; Cloudový klient; Kompaktný; Rozkladací; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Prenosný počítač; Klient vzdialenej pracovnej plochy; SAN; Úložná konštrukcia; USF; Ultrabook; Klient VDI; Pracovná stanica; Nulový klient; Iné
hu: Számítógépes űrlap: Kombinált; Blade szerver; Chromebook; Felhőügyfél; Kompakt; Hibrid; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Notebook; Távoli asztali ügyfél; SAN; Tároló; USF; Ultrabook; VDI-ügyfél; Munkaállomás; Zéró ügyfél; Egyéb
pt-BR: Forma computacional: All-in-one; Servidor Blade; Chromebook; Cliente de nuvem; Compacto; Conversível; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Notebook; Cliente de área de trabalho remota; SAN; Gabinete de armazenamento; USF; Ultrabook; Cliente VDI; Estação de trabalho; Thin client; Outro
ro-RO: Formă computer: All-in-one; Server lamă; Chromebook; Client în cloud; Compact; Convertibil; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Notebook; Client desktop la distanță; SAN; Carcasă; USF; Ultrabook; Client VDI; Workstation; Zero client; Altele
nl: Computerformulier: Alles-in-één; Bladeserver; Chromebook; Cloud-client; Compact; Converteerbaar; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Notebook; Externe desktopclient; SAN; Opbergbehuizing; USF; Ultrabook; VDI-client; Werkstation; Zeroclient; Andere
nb: Datamaskinskjema: Alt i ett; Bladserver; Chromebook; Skyklient; Kompakt; Omformbar; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Notisbok; Ekstern skrivebordsklient; SAN; Oppbevaringsskap; USF; Ultrabook; VDI-klient; Arbeidsstasjon; Nullklient; Annet
bg-BG: Форма на компютър: Всичко в едно; Блейд сървър; Chromebook; Клиент за облак; Компактен; 2 в 1; JBOD; NAS; Нетбук; Ноутбук; Клиент за отдалечен работен плот; SAN; Корпус за съхранение; USF; Ултрабук; VDI клиент; Работна станция; Нулев клиент; Други
ru: Конструкция компьютера: Все в одном; Блейд-сервер; Хромбук; Облачный клиент; Компактный; Трансформер; JBOD; NAS; Нетбук; Ноутбук; Клиент удаленного рабочего стола; SAN; Корпус для хранения; USF; Ультрабук; VDI-клиент; Рабочая станция; Нулевой клиент; Другое
tr: Bilgisayar Formu: Hepsi bir arada; Yaprak sunucu; Chromebook; Bulut istemcisi; Kompakt; Dönüştürülebilir; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Not defteri; Uzak masaüstü istemcisi; SAN; Depolama muhafazası; USF; Ultrabook; VDI istemcisi; İş istasyonu; Sıfır istemci; Diğer
el: Μορφή υπολογιστή: Όλα σε ένα; Εξυπηρετητής λεπίδων; Chromebook; Πελάτης νέφους; Μικρών διαστάσεων; Πολυχρηστικό; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Notebook; Πελάτης απομακρυσμένης επιφάνειας εργασίας; SAN; Χώρος αποθήκευσης; USF; Ultrabook; Πελάτης VDI; Σταθμός εργασίας; Zero client; Άλλο
da: Computerform: Alt-i-en; Bladserver; Chromebook; Cloud-klient; Kompakt; Konvertibel; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Notebook; Remote desktop-klient; SAN; Opbevaringskabinet; USF; Ultrabook; VDI-klient; Arbejdsstation; Nulklient; Andet
ko: 컴퓨터 형식: 올인원; 블레이드 서버; 크롬 북; 클라우드 클라이언트; 콤팩트; 컨버터블; JBOD; NAS; 넷북; 노트북; 원격 데스크톱 클라이언트; SAN; 스토리지 인클로저; USF; 울트라북; VDI 클라이언트; 워크스테이션; 제로 클라이언트; 기타
fi: Tietokonelomake: Kaikki yhdessä; Blade-palvelin; Chromebook; Pilviasiakas; Kompakti; Muunnettava; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Notebook; Etätyöpöytäohjelma; SAN; Säilytyskotelo; USF; Ultrabook; VDI-asiakas; Työasema; Kevyt asiakaspääte; Muu
ja: コンピューター形式: オールインワン; ブレードサーバー; Chromebook; クラウドクライアント; コンパクト; コンバーチブル; JBOD; NAS; ネットブック; ノートブック; リモートデスクトップクライアント; SAN; ストレージエンクロージャ; USF; ウルトラブック; VDIクライアント; ワークステーション; ゼロクライアント; その他
hr-HR: Oblik računala: Sve u jednom; Blade poslužitelj; Chromebook; Cloud klijent; Kompaktno; Promjenjivog oblika; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Bilježnica; Remote Desktop klijent; SAN; Kućište za pohranu; USF; Ultrabook; VDI klijent; Radna stanica; Nulti klijent; Ostalo
pt-PT: Formulário para computador: Tudo em um; Servidor Blade; Chromebook; Cliente na nuvem; Compacto; Conversível; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Caderno; Cliente em computador remoto; SAN; Caixa de armazenamento; USF; Ultrabook; Cliente VDI; Estação de trabalho; Cliente Zero; Outro
cs: Druh počítače: All-in-One; Blade server; Chromebook; Cloudový klient; Kompaktní; Konvertibilní; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Notebook; Klient vzdálené plochy; SAN; Úložný kryt; USF; Ultrabook; VDI klient; Pracovní stanice; Nulový klient; Jiné
sl-SI: Oblika računalnika: Vse v enem; Strežniška rezina; Chromebook; Odjemalec v oblaku; Kompaktno; Pretvorljivo; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Beležnica; Odjemalec oddaljenega namizja; SAN; Zaprto ohišje; USF; Ultrabook; Odjemalec VDI; Delovna postaja; Zero client; Drugo
lt-LT: Kompiuterinė forma: Viskas viename; „Blade“ tipo serveris; „Chromebook“; Debesijos klientas; Kompaktiškas; Transformuojamas; JBOD; NAS; „Netbook“; „Notebook“; Nuotolinio kompiuterio valdymo klientas; SAN; Serverių spinta; USF; „Ultrabook“; VDI klientas; Profesionalusis kompiuteris; Nulinis klientinis; Kita
de: Computerform: All-in-One; Bladeserver; Chromebook; Cloudclient; Kompakt; Konvertierbar; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Notebook; Remotedesktopclient; SAN; Speichergehäuse; USF; Ultrabook; VDI-Client; Arbeitsplatz; Zero-Client; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 電腦形式: 一體式電腦; 刀鋒伺服器; Chromebook; 雲端客戶端; 小巧; 可轉換; JBOD; NAS; 小筆電; 筆記型電腦; 遠端桌面用戶端; SAN; 儲存硬碟; USF; 超輕薄筆電; VDI 客戶端; 工作站; 極簡型電腦; 其他
zh-CN: 计算机形式: 一体机; 刀片服务器; 谷歌笔记本; 云客户端; 压缩式; 可转换; JBOD; NAS; 上网本; 笔记本; 远程桌面客户端; SAN; 存储盒; USF; 超极本; VDI 客户端; 工作站; 零客户端; 其他
th: รูปแบบคอมพิวเตอร์: ออลอินวัน; เบลดเซิร์ฟเวอร์; Chromebook; คลาวด์ไคลเอ็นต์; แบบกะทัดรัด; ปรับรูปแบบได้; JBOD; NAS; เน็ตบุ๊ก; โน้ตบุ๊ก; ไคลเอนต์เดสก์ท็อประยะไกล; SAN; กล่องอุปกรณ์เก็บข้อมูล; USF; อัลตร้าบุ๊ก; ไคลเอนต์ VDI; เวิร์กสเตชัน; Zero Client; อื่นๆ
en: Computer form: All-in-one; Blade server; Chromebook; Cloud client; Compact; Convertible; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Notebook; Remote desktop client; SAN; Storage enclosure; USF; Ultrabook; VDI client; Workstation; Zero client; Other
fr: Forme de l’ordinateur: PC tout-en-un; Serveur lame; Chromebook; Client cloud; Compact; Convertible; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Carnet de notes; Client de bureau à distance; SAN; Enceinte de stockage; USF; Ultrabook; Client VDI; Poste de travail; Zéro client; Autre
sv: Datorformulär: Allt-i-ett; Bladserver; Chromebook; Molnklient; Kompakt; Konvertibel; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Notebook; Fjärrskrivbordsklient; SAN; Förvaringskåp; USF; Ultrabook; VDI-klient; Arbetsstation; Nollklient; Övrigt
es: Forma de computadora: Todo en uno; Servidor Blade; Chromebook; Cliente de nube; Compacto; Convertible; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Libreta; Cliente de escritorio remoto; SAN; Caja de almacenamiento; USF; Ultrabook; Cliente de VDI; Estación de trabajo; Cliente cero; Otros
pl: Formularz komputerowy: Wszystko w jednym; Serwer kasetowy; Chromebook; Klient w chmurze; Kompaktowy; Wymienna; JBOD; NAS; Netbook; Notatnik; Klient pulpitu zdalnego; SAN; Obudowa do przechowywania; USF; Ultrabook; Klient VDI; Stacja robocza; Klient zerowy; Inne